Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2019
Tribal governments; assume responsibility for integrated solid waste management; department; duties.

Because of the rights of both tribal sovereignty and Nebraska citizenship of individuals under the jurisdiction of federally recognized tribal governments, such tribal governments are recognized as localities which can assume responsibility for integrated solid waste management. The department shall present the state's comprehensive solid waste management plan completed pursuant to section 81-15,166 to the federally recognized tribal governments in Nebraska and encourage such tribes to adopt the state's laws, rules, regulations, and standards for integrated solid waste management.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 19.